test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-kaotama59_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `kaotama: # Verb (59) `kaotama 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     kaotama+V+Inf/mA: kaotama
     kaotama+V+Inf: kaotaq
     kaotama+V+Act+PrfPrc: kaotanuq
     kaotama+V+Pss+PrfPrc: [kaotõt, kaotõdu]

     kaotama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaoda
     kaotama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [kaotat, kaotadõq]
     kaotama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kaotas
     kaotama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kaotamiq
     kaotama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kaotatiq
     kaotama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kaotasõq
     kaotama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Neg: [kaoda-aiq, kaoda-ai, kaoda-iq, kaoda-i]
     kaotama+V+Act+Ind+ConNegI: kaodaq
     kaotama+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: kaoda
     kaotama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kaodi
     kaotama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [kaotit, kaodiq, kaotidõq]
     kaotama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kaotʼ
     kaotama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kaotimiq
     kaotama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kaotitiq
     kaotama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [kaodiq, kaotivaq]
     kaotama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Neg: [kaoda-as, kaoda-s]

     kaotama+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaotõda
     kaotama+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kaotõdas

     kaotama+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kaotav

     kaotama+V+Jus: kaotaguq
##
#viskama => kaotama
     kaotama+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kaotõda
     kaotama+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [kaotõdat, kaotõdadõq]
     kaotama+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kaotõdas
     kaotama+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kaotõdamiq
     kaotama+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kaotõdatiq
     kaotama+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kaotõdasõq
     kaotama+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Neg: [kaotõda-aiq, kaotõda-ai, kaotõda-iq, kaotõda-i]
     kaotama+V+Pss+Ind+ConNegI: kaotõdaq
     kaotama+V+Pss+Ind+ConNegII: kaotõda

     kaotama+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kaotõdi
     kaotama+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [kaotõdit, kaotõdiq, kaotõdidõq]
     kaotama+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kaotõdi
     kaotama+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kaotõdimiq
     kaotama+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kaotõditiq
     kaotama+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [kaotõdiq, kaotõdivaq]
     kaotama+V+Pss+Ind+Prt+Neg: [kaotõda-as, kaotõda-s]

     kaotama+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kaotav
     kaotama+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Gen: kaotava
     kaotama+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Par: kaotavat
     kaotama+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Ill: kaotavahe
     kaotama+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: kaotavaq
     kaotama+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Gen: [kaotavidõ, kaotaviidõ]
     kaotama+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Par: [kaotavit, kaotaviid]
     kaotama+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Ill: [kaotavihe, kaotaviihe]
                    
     kaotama+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kaotõdav
     kaotama+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Gen: kaotõdava
     kaotama+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Par: kaotõdavat
     kaotama+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Ill: kaotõdavahe
     kaotama+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: kaotõdavaq
     kaotama+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Gen: [kaotõdavidõ, kaotõdaviidõ]
     kaotama+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Par: [kaotõdavit, kaotõdaviid]
     kaotama+V+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Ill: [kaotõdavihe, kaotõdaviihe]

     kaotama+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: kaotanuq
     kaotama+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Gen: kaotanu
     kaotama+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Par: kaotanut
     kaotama+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Ill: kaotanuhe
     kaotama+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: kaotanuq
     kaotama+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Gen: [kaotanuidõ, kaotanuisi]
     kaotama+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Par: [kaotanuid, kaotanuisi]
     kaotama+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Ill: [kaotanuihe, kaotanuisihe]

     kaotama+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: [kaotõt, kaotõdu]
     kaotama+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Gen: kaotõdu
     kaotama+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Par: kaotõdut
     kaotama+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Ill: kaotõduhe
     kaotama+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: kaotõduq
     kaotama+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Gen: [kaotõduidõ, kaotõduisi]
     kaotama+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Par: [kaotõduid, kaotõduisi]
     kaotama+V+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Ill: [kaotõduihe, kaotõduisihe]
